Arkansas, session 2025, HB1541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 20, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-20-108. Acceptance of state funds — Transportation required.
(a) A private school that accepts state funding of any type shall
provide transportation for students who are enrolled in the private school
and live within thirty-five (35) miles of the private school.
(b) Transportation required to be provided by a private school under
subsection (a) of this section shall be covered in its entirety by the
private school.
(c) As used in this section, "private school" means a nonpublic school
that:
(1) Offers instruction for students in grades kindergarten
through twelve (K-12) in this state; and
(2) Receives any type of state funding in any amount.
*TNL061*
01/22/2025 4:03:57 PM TNL061